Utah statutes.
7-1-317.   Reports of condition called for by commissioner.
The commissioner may call upon any institution under the jurisdiction of the
department for a report of its condition at the close of business on any day
specified in the call within the preceding three months. The reports required
shall be transmitted by the institution to the commissioner within 30 days
after the date of the call. Reports prepared by an independent certified
public accountant or reports accepted by supervisory agencies of the United
States or other states shall be acceptable.
